Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,121.01
Land surveying; entry upon land; authorized; liability for damages.

(1) A professional land surveyor, any person assisting a professional land surveyor, or a surveyor-in-training may:

(a) Enter public or private lands or waterways in this state, except for buildings, for the purpose of making a land survey;

(b) Investigate, recover, establish, reestablish, rehabilitate, perpetuate, or use evidence of a boundary location;

(c) Locate, relocate, use, install, perpetuate, or replace a survey monument; and

(d) Use any equipment that is required for the purpose of making a land survey.

(2) A vehicle used for land surveying shall be marked on the exterior with the name of the professional land surveyor or the firm which employs such professional land surveyor.

(3) Any professional land surveyor, person assisting a professional land surveyor, or surveyor-in-training who enters onto private property shall be liable for any actual damages done to such property by such professional land surveyor, person assisting such professional land surveyor, or surveyor-in-training, including damages done to crops. By such entry he or she shall forfeit any and all claims against the owner or tenant of the private property for damages or injury done to his or her person or equipment while on the private property, unless such damages or injuries are caused by the intentional conduct of such owner or tenant.

Laws 2024, LB102, § 19.
September 1, 2024